Florida, session 2026, SB1422.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 22 23 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (18) of section 24 373.414, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 25 373.414âAdditional criteria for activities in surface 26 waters and wetlands.â 27 (18)âThe department and each water management district 28 responsible for implementation of the environmental resource 29 permitting program shall develop a uniform mitigation assessment 30 method for wetlands and other surface waters. The department 31 shall adopt the uniform mitigation assessment method by rule no 32 later than July 31, 2002. The rule shall provide an exclusive 33 and consistent process for determining the amount of mitigation 34 required to offset impacts to wetlands and other surface waters, 35 and, once effective, shall supersede all rules, ordinances, and 36 variance procedures from ordinances that determine the amount of 37 mitigation needed to offset such impacts. Once the department 38 adopts the uniform mitigation assessment method by rule, the 39 uniform mitigation assessment method shall be binding on the 40 department, the water management districts, local governments, 41 and any other governmental agencies and shall be the sole means 42 to determine the amount of mitigation needed to offset adverse 43 impacts to wetlands and other surface waters and to award and 44 deduct mitigation bank credits. A water management district and 45 any other governmental agency subject to chapter 120 may apply 46 the uniform mitigation assessment method without the need to 47 adopt it pursuant to s. 120.54. It shall be a goal of the 48 department and water management districts that the uniform 49 mitigation assessment method developed be practicable for use 50 within the timeframes provided in the permitting process and 51 result in a consistent process for determining mitigation 52 requirements. It shall be recognized that any such method shall 53 require the application of reasonable scientific judgment. The 54 uniform mitigation assessment method must determine the value of 55 functions provided by wetlands and other surface waters 56 considering the current conditions of these areas, utilization 57 by fish and wildlife, location, uniqueness, and hydrologic 58 connection, and, when applied to mitigation banks, the factors 59 listed in s. 373.4136(4). The uniform mitigation assessment 60 method shall also account for the expected time-lag associated 61 with offsetting impacts and the degree of risk associated with 62 the proposed mitigation. The uniform mitigation assessment 63 method shall account for different ecological communities in 64 different areas of the state. In developing the uniform 65 mitigation assessment method, the department and water 66 management districts shall consult with approved local programs 67 under s. 403.182 which have an established mitigation program 68 for wetlands or other surface waters. The department and water 69 management districts shall consider the recommendations 70 submitted by such approved local programs, including any 71 recommendations relating to the adoption by the department and 72 water management districts of any uniform mitigation methodology 73 that has been adopted and used by an approved local program in 74 its established mitigation program for wetlands or other surface 75 waters. Environmental resource permitting rules may establish 76 categories of permits or thresholds for minor impacts under 77 which the use of the uniform mitigation assessment method will 78 not be required. The application of the uniform mitigation 79 assessment method is not subject to s. 70.001. In the event the 80 rule establishing the uniform mitigation assessment method is 81 deemed to be invalid, the applicable rules related to 82 establishing needed mitigation in existence prior to the 83 adoption of the uniform mitigation assessment method, including 84 those adopted by a county which is an approved local program 85 under s. 403.182, and the method described in paragraph (b) for 86 existing mitigation banks, shall be authorized for use by the 87 department, water management districts, local governments, and 88 other state agencies. 89 (a)âIn developing the uniform mitigation assessment method, 90 the department shall: 91 1.âSeek input from the United States Army Corps of 92 Engineers in order to promote consistency in the mitigation 93 assessment methods used by the state and federal permitting 94 programs. 95 2.âIncorporate habitat equivalency analysis. As used in 96 this paragraph, the term âhabitat equivalency analysisâ means a 97 type of methodology used to determine how much restoration is 98 necessary to compensate for adverse impacts. 99 Section 2.âSection 403.811, Florida Statutes, is amended to 100 read: 101 403.811âDredge and fill permits issued pursuant to this 102 chapter and s. 373.414.â 103 (1)âPermits or other orders addressing dredging and filling 104 in, on, or over waters of the state issued pursuant to this 105 chapter or s. 373.414(9) before the effective date of rules 106 adopted under s. 373.414(9) and permits or other orders issued 107 in accordance with s. 373.414(13), (14), (15), or (16) shall 108 remain valid through the duration specified in the permit or 109 order, unless revoked by the agency issuing the permit. The 110 agency issuing the permit or other order may seek to enjoin the 111 violation of, or to enforce compliance with, the permit or other 112 order as provided in ss. 403.121, 403.131, 403.141, and 403.161. 113 A violation of a permit or other order addressing dredging or 114 filling issued pursuant to this chapter is punishable by a civil 115 penalty as provided in s. 403.141 or a criminal penalty as 116 provided in s. 403.161. 117 (2)âPermits for dredging and filling must include a 118 requirement that dredging and turbidity monitoring be performed 119 by separate and distinct entities. The department shall adopt 120 rules to implement this subsection. 121 (3)âPermitted entities shall bear the full cost of and 122 responsibility for any damage or destruction caused by dredging, 123 filling, or related activities. 124 Section 3.âPresent subsections (5) through (12) of section 125 403.93345, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 126 through (13), respectively, and a new subsection (5) is added, 127 and present subsection (4) is amended to read: 128 403.93345âCoral reef protection.â 129 (4)(a)âThe Legislature finds that coral reefs are valuable 130 natural resources that contribute ecologically, aesthetically, 131 and economically to the state. Therefore, the Legislature 132 declares it is in the best interest of the state to clarify the 133 departmentâs powers and authority to protect coral reefs through 134 timely and efficient recovery of monetary damages resulting from 135 vessel groundings and anchoring-related injuries. 136 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that coral reefs, if 137 healthy and effectively managed, can help mitigate the risks and 138 related loss and damage from floods, climate change, and natural 139 disasters. The Legislature recognizes that studies have shown 140 that healthy coral reefs can protect coastal properties from 141 such climate change-related risks and disaster events, including 142 storms, high wave events, sea level rise, and flooding. The 143 Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) is responsible for 144 responding to natural disasters and providing technical and 145 financial hazard mitigation support, primarily distributed as 146 grant funding through FEMAâs hazard mitigation assistance 147 programs. Coral reef restoration for risk reduction, known as 148 CR4, is an active restoration strategy with the aim of 149 increasing the structural integrity and complexity of coral reef 150 ecosystems to attenuate wave energy and reduce coastal flooding. 151 Legislative recognition of coral reefs as critical natural 152 infrastructure and a nature-based solution demonstrates 153 political support for nature-based solutions. 154 (c)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that the department 155 be recognized as the stateâs lead trustee for coral reef 156 resources located within waters of the state or on sovereignty 157 submerged lands unless preempted by federal law. This section 158 does not divest other state agencies and political subdivisions 159 of the state of their interests in protecting coral reefs. 160 (5)âThe Legislature designates coral reefs as critical 161 natural infrastructure and as a nature-based solution that helps 162 mitigate climate change-related risks and disaster events, 163 including, exposure to storms, high wave events, sea level rise, 164 and flooding. 165 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 166 made by this act to section 373.414, Florida Statutes, in a 167 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) and 168 subsection (4) of section 373.4137, Florida Statutes, are 169 reenacted to read: 170 373.4137âMitigation requirements for specified 171 transportation projects.â 172 (2)âEnvironmental impact inventories for transportation 173 projects proposed by the Department of Transportation or a 174 transportation authority established pursuant to chapter 348 or 175 chapter 349 shall be developed as follows: 176 (b)âThe environmental impact inventory must include a 177 description of habitat impacts, including location, acreage, and 178 type; the anticipated mitigation needed based on the functional 179 loss as determined through the uniform mitigation assessment 180 method adopted by the Department of Environmental Protection by 181 rule pursuant to s. 373.414(18); identification of the proposed 182 mitigation option; state water quality classification of 183 impacted wetlands and other surface waters; any other state or 184 regional designations for these habitats; and a list of 185 threatened species, endangered species, and species of special 186 concern affected by the proposed project. 187 (4)âBefore March 1 of each year, each water management 188 district shall develop a mitigation plan to offset only the 189 impacts of transportation projects in the environmental impact 190 inventory for which a water management district is implementing 191 mitigation that meets the requirements of this section, 33 192 U.S.C. s. 1344, and 33 C.F.R. part 332. The water management 193 district mitigation plan must be developed in consultation with 194 the Department of Environmental Protection, the United States 195 Army Corps of Engineers, the Department of Transportation, 196 participating transportation authorities established pursuant to 197 chapter 348 or chapter 349, other appropriate federal, state, 198 and local governments, and other interested parties, including 199 entities operating mitigation banks. In developing such plans, 200 the water management districts shall use sound ecosystem 201 management practices to address significant water resource needs 202 and consider activities of the Department of Environmental 203 Protection and the water management districts, such as surface 204 water improvement and management (SWIM) projects and lands 205 identified for potential acquisition for preservation, 206 restoration, or enhancement, and the control of invasive and 207 exotic plants in wetlands and other surface waters, to the 208 extent that the activities comply with the mitigation 209 requirements adopted under this part, 33 U.S.C. s. 1344, and 33 210 C.F.R. part 332. The water management district mitigation plan 211 must identify each site where the water management district will 212 mitigate for a transportation project. For each mitigation site, 213 the water management district shall provide the scope of the 214 mitigation services; provide the functional gain as determined 215 through the uniform mitigation assessment method adopted by the 216 Department of Environmental Protection by rule pursuant to s. 217 373.414(18); describe how the mitigation offsets the impacts of 218 each transportation project as permitted; and provide a schedule 219 for the mitigation services. The water management districts 220 shall maintain records of costs incurred and payments received 221 for providing these services. Records must include, but are not 222 limited to, planning, land acquisition, design, construction, 223 staff support, long-term maintenance and monitoring of the 224 mitigation site, and other costs necessary to meet the 225 requirements of 33 U.S.C. s. 1344 and 33 C.F.R. part 332. To the 226 extent moneys paid to a water management district by the 227 Department of Transportation or a participating transportation 228 authority are greater than the amount spent by the water 229 management districts in providing the mitigation services to 230 offset the permitted transportation project impacts, these 231 moneys must be refunded to the Department of Transportation or 232 participating transportation authority. The mitigation plan 233 shall be submitted to the water management district governing 234 board or its designee for review and approval. At least 14 days 235 before approval by the governing board, the water management 236 district shall provide a copy of the draft mitigation plan to 237 the Department of Environmental Protection and any person who 238 has requested a copy. Subsequent to the governing board 239 approval, the mitigation plan shall be submitted to the 240 Department of Environmental Protection for approval. The plan 241 may not be implemented until it is submitted to, and approved in 242 part or in its entirety by, the Department of Environmental 243 Protection. 244 (a)âSpecific projects may be excluded from the mitigation 245 plan, in whole or in part, and are not subject to this section 246 upon the election of the Department of Transportation, a 247 transportation authority if applicable, or the appropriate water 248 management district. The Department of Transportation or a 249 participating transportation authority may not exclude a 250 transportation project from the mitigation plan if mitigation is 251 scheduled for implementation by the water management district in 252 the current fiscal year unless the transportation project is 253 removed from the Department of Transportationâs work program or 254 transportation authority funding plan, the mitigation cannot be 255 timely permitted to offset the impacts of a Department of 256 Transportation project identified in the environmental impact 257 inventory, or the proposed mitigation does not meet state and 258 federal requirements. If a project is removed from the work 259 program or the mitigation plan, costs spent by the water 260 management district before removal are eligible for 261 reimbursement by the Department of Transportation or 262 participating transportation authority. 263 (b)âWhen determining which projects to include in or 264 exclude from the mitigation plan, the Department of 265 Transportation shall investigate using credits from a permitted 266 mitigation bank before those projects are submitted for 267 inclusion in a water management district mitigation plan. The 268 Department of Transportation shall exclude a project from the 269 mitigation plan if the investigation undertaken pursuant to this 270 paragraph results in the conclusion that the use of credits from 271 a permitted mitigation bank promotes efficiency, timeliness in 272 project delivery, cost-effectiveness, and transfer of liability 273 for success and long-term maintenance. 274 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.